Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4614.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. All deeds A deed of lands situated land located in this state , heretofore or hereafter made by any a married woman individual jointly with her husband the individual's spouse by their attorney in fact, under a joint power of attorney, executed and acknowledged as required in the joint deed of a husband and wife, spouses, and recorded in the office of the register of deeds of the proper county, shall must be taken and deemed as between the parties thereto, to the deed, and all persons claiming under or through them, as valid and effectual to convey the legal title of the premises therein described in the deed, as if the same deed had been executed and acknowledged by the husband and wife spouses in person. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Joint Resolution ____ (request no. S00781'25) or House Joint Resolution F (request no. H00781'25) of the 103rd Legislature becomes a part of the state constitution of 1963 as provided in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963.